Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Aerosol duster” means a product used  to clean electronics and other items by means
of an aerosol sprayed from a pressurized container.
(b) “1,1-Difluoroethane” or “DFE” means a colorless, odorless gas with the  chemical
formula C 2H4F2, often used as a refrigerant or propellant and that has  a Chemical Abstract
Service Registry Number of 75-37-6.
(2) An entity  that makes retail sales of aerosol dusters that contain DFE may not sell
an aerosol duster that contains DFE to an individual who is under 18 years of age.
(3)(a) Prior to selling or delivering an aerosol duster that contains DFE to  an individual,
an entity or employee of the entity shall require the individual to produce  one of the fol-
lowing pieces of identification in order to verify that  the individual is at least 18 years of age:
(A) A passport;
(B) A driver license, whether issued in this state or by another state;
(C) An identification card issued under ORS 807.400;
(D) An identification card issued by the United States military; or
(E) Any other identification card issued by a state that bears a picture  of the individual,
the name of the individual, the date of birth of the individual and  a physical description of
the individual.
(b) The piece of identification presented must establish that the individual is at least 18
years of age and accurately describe the individual.
(4) An entity described in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Shall maintain the entity’s inventory of aerosol dusters that contain DFE in  a lo-
cation that is not directly accessible to the public.
(b) May not  sell or deliver more than three aerosol dusters containing DFE to an indi-
vidual in a single transaction.
(c) May sell or deliver  an aerosol duster that contains DFE through an order pick-up or
delivery system, including through a third-party delivery platform. An  entity that sells or
delivers an aerosol duster  that contains DFE under this paragraph shall ensure that the in-
dividual who receives the aerosol duster through the order pick-up or delivery system is  at
least 18 years of age.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1032 (SB 1032-A) Page 1
(5) An aerosol  duster that contains DFE may not be sold or delivered unless the aerosol
duster bears a label that:
(a) Includes, in a font size at least the same size as any other warning  labels on the
aerosol duster:
(A)(i) The statement: “DANGER: DEATH!  Breathing this product to get high can kill
you”; and
(ii) The poison control center phone number of 1-800-222-1222; or
(B) A statement substantially similar to the following:
(i) “Deliberate misuse by  concentrating and inhaling the contents of this product can be
harmful or fatal”; or
(ii) “Intentional misuse  by deliberately concentrating and inhaling the vapors from this
product can be harmful or fatal”; or
(b) Otherwise complies with the Federal Hazardous Substances Act,  15 U.S.C. 1261 et
seq., and regulations adopted under the Federal Hazardous Substances Act.
(6) Subsections (3) and (4) of this  section do not apply to sales or deliveries of aerosol
dusters that contain DFE made to manufacturers, distributors, retailers, office wholesalers
or other business entities.
(7) Violation of this section is a Class C  misdemeanor. It is an affirmative defense to a
charge of violating subsection (2) of  this section that the defendant reasonably and in good
faith relied on a piece of identification described in subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) Section 1 of this 2025 Act  applies to retail sales of aerosol dusters that
contain DFE, as defined in section 1 of this 2025 Act, made on or after January 1, 2026.
(2) The labeling requirements of section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to aerosol dusters  con-
taining DFE that are manufactured on or after January 1, 2026.
Passed by Senate April 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1032 (SB 1032-A) Page 2